Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 59 Stalking

11-59-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

“Harasses” means a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person with the intent to seriously alarm, annoy, or bother the person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 183, § 1.

11-59-2.
Stalking prohibited.

Any person who: (1) harasses another person; or (2) willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly follows another person with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear of bodily injury, is guilty of the crime of stalking.

Stalking shall be deemed a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 358, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 183, § 1.

11-59-3.
Repealed.